District of Columbia statutes.
8-810

Mayor to issue rules.

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement this chapter under the provisions of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, and the rules shall, at the least, establish a program of community service which may be used, according to an agreement under §§ 8-805(c)(3) and 8-807(e), as an alternative sanction under § 8-807(e).

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-100, § 11, 33 DCR 781
This section is referenced in § 8-805, § 8-807, and § 8-808.
1981 Ed., § 6-2910.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 6-100, the “Litter Control Administration Act of 1985”, see Mayor’s Order 2000-184, December 5, 2000 ( 47 DCR 10222).